Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1143
Fiscal year for purposes of act.

The fiscal year for all programs reimbursed pursuant to the Special Education Act shall begin on September 1 of each year and end on August 31 of the following year. Funds appropriated for any period ending on June 30 of a given year for actual transportation expenses for children with disabilities pursuant to section 79-1129 may be spent or obligated through August 31 of that year for such purpose.

Laws 1989, LB 487, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3332.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 825;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 31.

School fiscal year, see section 79-1091.